Nebraska, session 109, LB1040.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 71-901, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-901 Sections 71-901 to 71-964 and sections 3 and 5 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment
Act.
Sec. 2. Section 71-903, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-903 For purposes of the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections
71-904 to 71-914.03 and sections 3 and 5 of this act shall apply.
Sec. 3. Interested party means:
(1) A spouse, parent, sibling, or adult child of an individual;
(2) A close adult friend of an individual;
(3) A guardian or conservator of an individual; or
(4) Another person acting in the best interests of the individual.
Sec. 4. Section 71-908, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-908 Mentally ill and dangerous person means a person who is
mentally ill or substance dependent and because of such mental illness or
substance dependence presents:
(1) A substantial risk of serious harm to another person or persons
within the near future as manifested by evidence of recent violent acts
or threats of violence or by placing others in reasonable fear of such
harm; or
(2) A substantial risk of serious harm to himself or herself within
the near future as manifested by:
(a) Evidence evidence of recent attempts at, or threats of, suicide
or serious bodily harm; or
(b) Evidence evidence of inability to provide for his or her basic
human needs, including food, clothing, shelter, essential medical care,
or personal safety; or .
-2-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
(c) Evidence of recent deterioration in physical or mental well
being; or
(3) A substantial and immediate risk of causing significant damage
to property of another as evidenced by recent acts of property damage.
Sec. 5. Except as otherwise provided in section 71-963, petitioner
means the individual who filed a petition under section 71-921, and may
include the county attorney or an interested party.
Sec. 6. Section 71-921, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-921 (1)(a) (1) Any person who believes that another person is
mentally ill and dangerous may communicate such belief to the county
attorney. The filing of a certificate by a law enforcement officer under
section 71-919 shall be sufficient to communicate such belief. If the
county attorney concurs that such person is mentally ill and dangerous
and that neither voluntary hospitalization nor other treatment
alternatives less restrictive of the subject's liberty than inpatient or
outpatient treatment ordered by a mental health board is available or
would suffice to prevent the harm described in section 71-908, he or she
shall file a petition as provided in this section.
(b) An interested party may file a petition as provided in this
section if he or she believes that another person is mentally ill and
dangerous and that neither voluntary hospitalization nor other treatment
alternatives less restrictive of the person's liberty than inpatient or
outpatient treatment ordered by a mental health board is available or
would suffice to prevent the harm described in section 71-908.
(2) The petition shall be filed with the clerk of the district court
in any county within: (a) The judicial district in which the subject is
located; (b) the judicial district in which the alleged behavior of the
subject occurred which constitutes the basis for the petition; or (c)
another judicial district in the State of Nebraska if authorized, upon
good cause shown, by a district judge of the judicial district in which
-3-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
the subject is located. In such event, all proceedings before the mental
health board shall be conducted by the mental health board serving such
other county, and all costs relating to such proceedings shall be paid by
the county of residence of the subject. In the order transferring such
cause to another county, the judge shall include such directions as are
reasonably necessary to protect the rights of the subject.
(3) The petition shall be in writing and shall include the following
information:
(a) The subject's name and address, if known;
(b) The name and address of the subject's spouse, legal counsel,
guardian or conservator, and next-of-kin, if known;
(c) The name and address of anyone providing psychiatric or other
care or treatment to the subject, if known;
(d) A statement that the petitioner county attorney has probable
cause to believe that the subject of the petition is mentally ill and
dangerous;
(e) A statement that the beliefs of the petitioner county attorney
are based on specific behavior, acts, attempts, or threats which shall be
specified and described in detail in the petition; and
(f) For a petition filed by an interested party, the nature of the
interested party's relationship with the subject of the petition; and
(g) For a petition filed by an interested party described in
subdivision (4) of section 3 of this act, specific facts supporting the
claim that the petitioner is acting in the subject's best interests;
(h) (f) The name and address of any other person who may have
knowledge of the subject's mental illness or substance dependence and who
may be called as a witness at a mental health board hearing with respect
to the subject, if known.
(4) A petition shall contain a declaration by the petitioner, under
penalty of perjury, that the contents of the petition are accurate to the
best of the petitioner's knowledge and belief.
-4-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
Sec. 7. Section 71-922, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
71-922 (1) Mental health board proceedings shall be deemed to have
commenced upon the earlier of (a) the filing of a petition under section
71-921 or (b) notification by the county attorney to the law enforcement
officer who took the subject into emergency protective custody under
section 71-920 or the administrator of the facility or jail having charge
of the subject of his or her intention to file such petition. The county
attorney shall file such petition as soon as reasonably practicable after
such notification.
(2) A petition filed by the county attorney under section 71-921 may
contain a request for the emergency protective custody and evaluation of
the subject prior to commencement of a mental health board hearing
pursuant to such petition with respect to the subject. Upon receipt of
such request and upon a finding of probable cause to believe that the
subject is mentally ill and dangerous as alleged in the petition, the
court or chairperson of the mental health board may issue a warrant
directing the sheriff to take custody of the subject. If the subject is
already in emergency protective custody under a certificate filed under
section 71-919, a copy of such certificate shall be filed with the
petition. The subject in such custody shall be held in the nearest
appropriate and available medical facility and shall not be placed in a
jail or other correctional facility except as required or authorized by
subsection (2) of section 71-919. Each county shall make arrangements
with appropriate medical facilities inside or outside the county for such
purpose and shall pay the cost of the emergency protective custody of
persons from such county in such facilities.
(3) The petition and all subsequent pleadings and filings in the
case shall be entitled In the Interest of ........, Alleged to be
Mentally Ill and Dangerous.
(4) The county attorney or interested party may dismiss his or her
-5-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
the petition at any time prior to the commencement of the hearing of the
mental health board under section 71-924, and upon such motion by the
county attorney or interested party, the mental health board shall
dismiss such the petition.
(5)(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to file a petition under
section 71-921 as an interested party if done in bad faith or for an
improper purpose. A violation of this subsection is a Class IV felony.
(b) If the mental health board determines that an interested party
has filed a petition in violation of this subsection, the board shall
refer the matter to the county attorney for prosecution.
Sec. 8. Section 71-923, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-923 (1) Upon the filing of the petition under section 71-921, the
clerk of the district court shall cause a summons fixing the time and
place for a hearing to be prepared and issued to the sheriff for service.
The sheriff shall personally serve upon the subject and the subject's
legal guardian or custodian, if any, the summons and copies of the
petition, the list of rights provided by sections 71-943 to 71-960, and a
list of the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of mental health
professionals in that immediate vicinity by whom the subject may be
evaluated prior to his or her hearing. The summons shall fix a time for
the hearing within seven calendar days after the subject has been taken
into emergency protective custody. The failure of a subject to appear as
required under this section shall constitute grounds for the issuance by
the mental health board of a warrant for his or her custody.
(2) When a petition is filed by an interested party, the clerk of
the district court shall cause a notice of such filing to be provided to
the county attorney.
Sec. 9. Section 71-925, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-925 (1) The petitioner state has the burden to prove by clear and
-6-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
convincing evidence that (a) the subject is mentally ill and dangerous
and (b) neither voluntary hospitalization nor other treatment
alternatives less restrictive of the subject's liberty than inpatient or
outpatient treatment ordered by the mental health board are available or
would suffice to prevent the harm described in section 71-908.
(2) If the mental health board finds that the subject is not
mentally ill and dangerous, the board shall dismiss the petition and
order the unconditional discharge of the subject.
(3) If the mental health board finds that the subject is mentally
ill and dangerous but that voluntary hospitalization or other treatment
alternatives less restrictive of the subject's liberty than treatment
ordered by the mental health board are available and would suffice to
prevent the harm described in section 71-908, the board shall (a) dismiss
the petition and order the unconditional discharge of the subject or (b)
suspend further proceedings for a period of up to ninety days to permit
the subject to obtain voluntary treatment. At any time during such
ninety-day period, the petitioner county attorney may apply to the board
for reinstatement of proceedings with respect to the subject, and after
notice to the subject, the subject's counsel, and the subject's legal
guardian or conservator, if any, the board shall hear the application. If
no such application is filed or pending at the conclusion of such ninety-
day period, the board shall dismiss the petition and order the
unconditional discharge of the subject.
(4) If the subject admits the allegations of the petition or the
mental health board finds that the subject is mentally ill and dangerous
and that neither voluntary hospitalization nor other treatment
alternatives less restrictive of the subject's liberty than inpatient or
outpatient treatment ordered by the board are available or would suffice
to prevent the harm described in section 71-908, the board shall, within
forty-eight hours, (a) order the subject to receive outpatient treatment
or (b) order the subject to receive inpatient treatment. If the subject
-7-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
is ordered by the board to receive inpatient treatment, the order shall
commit the subject to the custody of the Department of Health and Human
Services for such treatment.
(5) A subject who (a) is ordered by the mental health board to
receive inpatient treatment and (b) has not yet been admitted for such
treatment pursuant to such order may petition for a rehearing by the
mental health board based on improvement in the subject's condition such
that inpatient treatment ordered by the board would no longer be
necessary or appropriate.
(6) A treatment order by the mental health board under this section
shall represent the appropriate available treatment alternative that
imposes the least possible restraint upon the liberty of the subject, in
accordance with any recommendation of a treatment provider. The board
shall consider all treatment alternatives, based on any recommendation of
a treatment provider, including any treatment program or conditions
suggested by the subject, the subject's counsel, or other interested
person. Inpatient hospitalization or custody shall only be considered as
a treatment alternative of last resort. The petitioner county attorney
and the subject may jointly offer a proposed treatment order for adoption
by the board. The board may enter the proposed order without a full
hearing.
(7) The mental health board may request the assistance of the
Department of Health and Human Services or any other person or public or
private entity to advise the board prior to the entry of a treatment
order pursuant to this section and may require the subject to submit to
reasonable psychiatric and psychological evaluation to assist the board
in preparing such order. Any mental health professional conducting such
evaluation at the request of the mental health board shall be compensated
by the county or counties served by such board at a rate determined by
the district judge and reimbursed for mileage at the rate provided in
section 81-1176.
-8-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
Sec. 10. Section 71-930, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-930 The subject of a petition or the petitioner county attorney
may appeal a treatment order of the mental health board under section
71-925 to the district court. Such appeals shall be de novo on the
record. A final order of the district court may be appealed to the Court
of Appeals in accordance with the procedure in criminal cases. The final
judgment of the court shall be certified to and become a part of the
records of the mental health board with respect to the subject.
Sec. 11. Section 71-932, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-932 The person or entity designated by the mental health board
under section 71-931 to prepare and oversee the subject's individualized
treatment plan shall submit periodic reports to the mental health board
of the subject's progress under such plan and any modifications to the
plan. The mental health board may distribute copies of such reports to
other interested persons parties as permitted by law. With respect to a
subject ordered by the mental health board to receive inpatient
treatment, such initial report shall be filed with the mental health
board for review and inclusion in the subject's file and served upon the
county attorney, the subject, the subject's counsel, and the subject's
legal guardian or conservator, if any, no later than ten days after
submission of the subject's individualized treatment plan. With respect
to each subject committed by the mental health board, such reports shall
be so filed and served no less frequently than every ninety days for a
period of one year following submission of the subject's individualized
treatment plan and every six months thereafter.
Sec. 12. Section 71-949, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-949 (1) Counsel for a subject, upon request made to the county
attorney or interested party who has filed a petition at any time after
-9-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
the subject has been taken into emergency protective custody under the
Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act,
or after the filing of a petition under section 71-921 or 71-1205,
whichever occurs first, shall have the right to be provided with:
(a) The (1) the names of all witnesses expected to testify in
support of the petition; ,
(b) Knowledge (2) knowledge of the location and access at reasonable
times for review or copying of all written documents including reports of
peace officers, law enforcement agencies, and mental health
professionals; ,
(c) Access (3) access to all other tangible objects relating to the
petition in the possession of the county attorney or interested party or
to which the county attorney or interested party has access; , and
(d) Written (4) written records of any treatment facility or mental
health professional which or who has at any time treated the subject for
mental illness, substance dependence, or a personality disorder, which
records are relevant to the issues of whether the subject is mentally ill
and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender and, if so, what treatment
disposition should be ordered by the mental health board.
(2) The board may order further discovery at its discretion.
(3)(a) The county attorney shall have a reciprocal right to discover
items and information comparable to those first discovered by the
subject.
(b) The county court and district court shall have the power to rule
on objections to discovery in matters which are not self-activating.
(4) The right of appeal from denial of discovery shall be at the
time of the conclusion of the mental health board hearing.
Sec. 13. Section 81-1850, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
81-1850 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Covered offense means:
-10-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
(i) Murder in the first degree, section 28-303;
(ii) Murder in the second degree, section 28-304;
(iii) Manslaughter, section 28-305;
(iv) Motor vehicle homicide, section 28-306;
(v) Assault in the first degree, section 28-308;
(vi) Assault in the second degree, section 28-309;
(vii) Assault by strangulation or suffocation, section 28-310.01;
(viii) Terroristic threats, section 28-311.01;
(ix) Stalking, section 28-311.03;
(x) Kidnapping, section 28-313;
(xi) False imprisonment in the first degree, section 28-314;
(xii) Sexual abuse by a school employee, section 28-316.01;
(xiii) Sexual assault in the first degree, section 28-319;
(xiv) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree, section
28-319.01;
(xv) Sexual assault in the second degree, section 28-320;
(xvi) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree,
section 28-320.01;
(xvii) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication
device, section 28-320.02;
(xviii) Sexual abuse of a protected individual, section 28-322.04;
(xix) Domestic assault in the first or second degree, section
28-323;
(xx) Sex trafficking, sex trafficking of a minor, labor trafficking,
or labor trafficking of a minor, section 28-831; or
(xxi) An attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an offense
listed in subdivision (1)(a) of this section; and
(b) Victim has the same meaning as in section 29-119.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section,
when a person is convicted of a felony, the county attorney shall forward
the name and address of any victim of such convicted person to the Board
-11-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services, the county
corrections agency, the Department of Health and Human Services, and the
Board of Pardons, as applicable.
(b) A victim may waive the right to notification under this section
by notifying the county attorney, in which case the county attorney is
not required to comply with subdivision (2)(a) of this section.
(c) The Board of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services,
the county corrections agency, the Department of Health and Human
Services, and the Board of Pardons shall include the victim's name in the
file of the convicted person, but the name shall not be part of the
public record of any parole or pardons hearings of the convicted person.
(d) Any victim, including a victim who has waived his or her right
to notification, may request the notification prescribed in this section,
as applicable, by sending a written request to the Board of Parole, the
Department of Correctional Services, the county corrections agency, the
Department of Health and Human Services, or the Board of Pardons any time
after the convicted person is incarcerated and until the convicted person
is no longer under the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole, the county
corrections agency, the Department of Correctional Services, or the Board
of Pardons or, if the convicted person is under the jurisdiction of the
Department of Health and Human Services, within the three-year period
after the convicted person is no longer under the jurisdiction of the
Board of Parole, the county corrections agency, the Department of
Correctional Services, or the Board of Pardons.
(3) A victim whose name appears in the file of the convicted person
shall be notified by the Board of Parole:
(a) Within ninety days after conviction of an offender, of the
tentative date of release and the earliest parole eligibility date of
such offender;
(b) Of any parole hearings or proceedings;
(c) Of any decision of the Board of Parole;
-12-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
(d) When a convicted person who is on parole is returned to custody
because of parole violations; and
(e) If the convicted person has been adjudged a mentally disordered
sex offender or is a convicted sex offender, when such convicted person
is released from custody or treatment.
Such notification shall be given in person, by telecommunication, or
by mail.
(4) A victim whose name appears in the file of the convicted person
shall be notified by the Department of Correctional Services or a county
corrections agency:
(a) When a convicted person is granted a furlough or release from
incarceration for twenty-four hours or longer or any transfer of the
convicted person to community status;
(b) When a convicted person is released into community-based
programs, including educational release and work release programs. Such
notification shall occur at the beginning and termination of any such
program;
(c) When a convicted person escapes or does not return from a
granted furlough or release and again when the convicted person is
returned into custody;
(d) When a convicted person is discharged from custody upon
completion of his or her sentence. Such notice shall be given at least
thirty days before discharge, when practicable;
(e) Of the (i) department's calculation of the earliest parole
eligibility date of the prisoner with all potential good time or
disciplinary credits considered if the sentence exceeds ninety days or
(ii) county corrections agency's calculation of the earliest release date
of the prisoner. The victim may request one notice of the calculation
described in this subdivision. Such information shall be mailed not later
than thirty days after receipt of the request;
(f) Of any reduction in the prisoner's minimum sentence; and
-13-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
(g) Of the victim's right to submit a statement as provided in
section 81-1848.
(5) A victim whose name appears in the file of a convicted person
shall be notified by the Department of Health and Human Services:
(a) When a person described in subsection (6) of this section
becomes the subject of a petition pursuant to the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act prior to his or her
discharge from custody upon the completion of his or her sentence or
within thirty days after such discharge. The county attorney who filed
the petition shall notify the Department of Correctional Services of such
petition. For a petition filed by an interested party, the mental health
board shall request the county attorney to notify the Department of
Correctional Services of the filing of such petition and the county
attorney shall provide such notification. The Department of Correctional
Services shall forward the names and addresses of victims appearing in
the file of the convicted person to the Department of Health and Human
Services; and
(b) When a person under a mental health board commitment pursuant to
subdivision (a) of this subsection:
(i) Escapes from an inpatient facility providing board-ordered
treatment and again when the person is returned to an inpatient facility;
(ii) Is discharged or has a change in disposition from inpatient
board-ordered treatment;
(iii) Is granted a furlough or release for twenty-four hours or
longer; and
(iv) Is released into educational release programs or work release
programs. Such notification shall occur at the beginning and termination
of any such program.
(6) Subsection (5) of this section applies to a person convicted of
a covered offense which is also alleged to be the recent act or threat
underlying the commitment of such person as mentally ill and dangerous or
-14-

LB1040 LB1040
2026 2026
as a dangerous sex offender as defined in section 83-174.01.
(7) A victim whose name appears in the file of a person convicted of
a covered offense shall be notified, via certified mail, by the Board of
Pardons:
(a) Of any pardon or commutation proceedings at least thirty
calendar days prior to the proceedings; and
(b) If a pardon or commutation has been granted, within ten days
after such granting.
(8) The Board of Parole, the Department of Correctional Services,
the Department of Health and Human Services, and the Board of Pardons
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as needed to carry out
this section.
(9) The victim's address and telephone number maintained by the
Department of Correctional Services, the Department of Health and Human
Services, the county corrections agency, the Board of Parole, and the
Board of Pardons pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be
exempt from disclosure under Nebraska public records laws and federal
freedom of information laws, as such federal laws existed on January 1,
2004.
Sec. 14. Original sections 71-908, 71-921, 71-923, 71-925, 71-930,
71-932, and 71-949, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
71-901, 71-903, 71-922, and 81-1850, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-15-